District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-207.36

Independent audit.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 822, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 736
Sept. 13, 1982, 96 Stat. 1068, Pub. L. 97-258, § 5(b)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-118.1.

Editor's Notes

This section is set out above to correct an error appearing in the bound volume.